District of Columbia statutes.
42-3651.03

Petition for receivership.

(a)

Notwithstanding the availability of any other remedy, the Corporation Counsel may, in the name of the District of Columbia and based on the grounds set forth in § 42-3651.02, petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia (“Court”) to appoint a receiver of the rents or payments for use and occupancy for the affected rental housing accommodation.

(b)

Notwithstanding the availability of any other remedy, a majority of the tenants in the rental housing accommodation may, based on the grounds set forth in § 42-3651.02, submit a written request asking the Corporation Counsel to petition the Court to appoint a receiver of the rents or payments for use and occupancy of the affected rental housing accommodation. If the Corporation Counsel denies the request or does not file a petition within 5 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after receiving a request, the requestor may file with the Court a petition for the appointment of a receiver.

(c)

Except as provided in § 42-3651.04(b), the Court shall set a date for a hearing on the petition no later than 30 days after the filing of the petition.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 503, 48 DCR 1888

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-3651.04, § 42-3651.05, and § 42-3651.07.